apertium-id-ms.id.metadix
    <pardef n="mempergaul/kan__vblex">
    <e c="memper-kan, memper-i">
      <p>
        <l>kan</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kannya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mempersalin/__vblex">
    <e c="memper-, memper-kan, memper-i">
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kan</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kannya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <!-- memper- (N -> V) -->
    <pardef n="memperadik/__n">
    <e c="memper">
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="memperanak/kan__n">
    <e c="memper-kan">
      <p>
        <l>kan</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kannya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mempersenjata/i__n">
    <e c="memper-i">
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mempersiang/__n">
    <e c="memper-, memper-i">
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="memperdaya/__n">
    <e c="memper-, memper-kan">
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kan</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kannya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="memperkebun/kan__n">
    <e c="memper-kan, memper-i">
      <p>
        <l>kan</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kannya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="memperalat/__n">
    <e c="memper-, memper-kan, memper-i">
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kan</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kannya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inya</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <!-- memper- (Adj -> V) -->
    <pardef n="memperaman/__adj">
    <e c="memper">
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mempergembira/kan__adj">
    <e c="memper-kan">
      <p>
        <l>kan</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kannya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="memperbaik/i__adj">
    <e c="memper-i">
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="memperbanyak/__adj">
    <e c="memper-, memper-kan">
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kan</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kannya</l>
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="actio"/><s n="actv"/><s n="per-kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- diper- (V -> V) -->
    <pardef n="diperbuat/__vblex">
    <e c="diper-">
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>nya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="diperdengar/kan__vblex">
    <e c="diper-kan">
      <p>
        <l>kan</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-kan"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kannya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-kan"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dipergantung/i__vblex">
    <e c="diper-i">
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-i"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>inya</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pasv"/><s n="per-i"/><s n="nya"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="gaul"><p><l>mempergaul</l><r>gaul</r></p><par n="mempergaul/kan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ingat"><p><l>memperingat</l><r>ingat</r></p><par n="mempergaul/kan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="salin"><p><l>mempersalin</l><r>salin</r></p><par n="mempersalin/__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="babu"><p><l>memperbabu</l><r>babu</r></p><par n="memperadik/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="budak"><p><l>memperbudak</l><r>budak</r></p><par n="memperadik/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kacang"><p><l>memperkacang</l><r>kacang</r></p><par n="memperadik/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tangis"><p><l>mempertangis</l><r>tangis</r></p><par n="memperadik/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="contoh"><p><l>mempercontoh</l><r>contoh</r></p><par n="memperanak/kan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="judi"><p><l>memperjudi</l><r>judi</r></p><par n="memperanak/kan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="olah"><p><l>memperolah</l><r>olah</r></p><par n="memperanak/kan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sewa"><p><l>mempersewa</l><r>sewa</r></p><par n="memperanak/kan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="antara"><p><l>memperantara</l><r>antara</r></p><par n="mempersenjata/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="senjata"><p><l>mempersenjata</l><r>senjata</r></p><par n="mempersenjata/i__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kebun"><p><l>memperkebun</l><r>kebun</r></p><par n="memperkebun/kan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pukul"><p><l>memperpukul</l><r>pukul</r></p><par n="memperkebun/kan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="selang"><p><l>memperselang</l><r>selang</r></p><par n="memperkebun/kan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="siang"><p><l>mempersiang</l><r>siang</r></p><par n="mempersiang/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="daya"><p><l>memperdaya</l><r>daya</r></p><par n="memperdaya/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gundik"><p><l>mempergundik</l><r>gundik</r></p><par n="memperdaya/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="laki"><p><l>memperlaki</l><r>laki</r></p><par n="memperdaya/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="setan"><p><l>mempersetan</l><r>setan</r></p><par n="memperdaya/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alat"><p><l>memperalat</l><r>alat</r></p><par n="memperalat/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ladang"><p><l>memperladang</l><r>ladang</r></p><par n="memperalat/__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cepat"><p><l>mempercepat</l><r>cepat</r></p><par n="memperaman/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="gundah"><p><l>mempergundah</l><r>gundah</r></p><par n="memperaman/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lebar"><p><l>memperlebar</l><r>lebar</r></p><par n="memperaman/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="renggang"><p><l>memperenggang</l><r>renggang</r></p><par n="memperaman/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lalai"><p><l>memperlalai</l><r>lalai</r></p><par n="mempergembira/kan__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lemah"><p><l>memperlemah</l><r>lemah</r></p><par n="mempergembira/kan__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ringan"><p><l>memperingan</l><r>ringan</r></p><par n="mempergembira/kan__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tahan"><p><l>mempertahan</l><r>tahan</r></p><par n="mempergembira/kan__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="baru"><p><l>memperbaru</l><r>baru</r></p><par n="memperbaik/i__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="carut"><p><l>mempercarut</l><r>carut</r></p><par n="memperbaik/i__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lengkap"><p><l>memperlengkap</l><r>lengkap</r></p><par n="memperbaik/i__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sakit"><p><l>mempersakit</l><r>sakit</r></p><par n="memperbaik/i__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dekat"><p><l>memperdekat</l><r>dekat</r></p><par n="memperbanyak/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="imbang"><p><l>memperimbang</l><r>imbang</r></p><par n="memperbanyak/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lapang"><p><l>memperlapang</l><r>lapang</r></p><par n="memperbanyak/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="teguh"><p><l>memperteguh</l><r>teguh</r></p><par n="memperbanyak/__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dekap"><p><l>diperdekap</l><r>dekap</r></p><par n="diperbuat/__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gegas"><p><l>dipergegas</l><r>gegas</r></p><par n="diperbuat/__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hidup"><p><l>diperhidup</l><r>hidup</r></p><par n="diperbuat/__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ulur"><p><l>diperulur</l><r>ulur</r></p><par n="diperbuat/__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="kitar"><p><l>diperkitar</l><r>kitar</r></p><par n="diperdengar/kan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="tangguh"><p><l>dipertangguh</l><r>tangguh</r></p><par n="diperdengar/kan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="turut"><p><l>diperturut</l><r>turut</r></p><par n="diperdengar/kan__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="gantung"><p><l>dipergantung</l><r>gantung</r></p><par n="dipergantung/i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hias"><p><l>diperhias</l><r>hias</r></p><par n="dipergantung/i__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lindung"><p><l>diperlindung</l><r>lindung</r></p><par n="dipergantung/i__vblex"/></e>
